Tennessee, session 114, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1314(b), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(5) If the city, town, municipality, or metropolitan government has a population of
at least one hundred eighty-one thousand (181,000) and is located in a county having a
population of not less than three hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred (366,200),
according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the manner of
storage of firearms, firearm ammunition, and firearm accessories.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1231
000630
- 1 -